South Dakota, session 2026, SB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 28-6:
The Department of Social Service shall, for a medical assistance recipient under
this chapter, reimburse therapy using equine movement provided by:
(1) A physical therapist licensed in accordance with chapter 36-10;
(2) An occupational therapist licensed in accordance with chapter 36-31; or
(3) A speech-language pathologist licensed in accordance with chapter 36-37.
For purposes of this section, "therapy using equine movement" means therapeutic
activities that leverage horse-human interactions to facilitate progression toward meeting
therapeutic goals.
Section 2. The Department of Social Services shall, on or before August 1, 2026, submit a
state plan amendment to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to effectuate the
coverage referenced in section 1 of this Act.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.